Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska26-121
Protection order; forms provided; State Court Administrator; duties.

(1) The clerk of the district court shall make available standard petition and affidavit forms for all types of protection orders provided by law with instructions for completion to be used by a petitioner.

(2) Affidavit forms shall request all relevant information, including, but not limited to: A description of the most recent incident that was the basis for the application for a protection order and the date or approximate date of the incident and, if there was more than one incident, the most severe incident and the date or approximate date of such incident. The affidavit form shall permit the petitioner to request that any contact information of the petitioner be kept confidential. If the petitioner makes such request, such information shall not be released and shall only be available for the court's use.

(3) The State Court Administrator shall adopt and promulgate the standard petition and affidavit forms provided for in this section as well as the standard temporary ex parte and final protection order forms and provide a copy of such forms to all clerks of the district courts in this state. These standard forms shall be the only such forms used in this state.

Laws 1989, LB 330, § 13;

Laws 1997, LB 393, § 2;

Laws 1998, LB 218, § 22;

Laws 2019, LB532, § 4;

R.S.Supp.,2024, § 42-924.02;

Laws 2025, LB80, § 21.